output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_LatinicaEtimologicna.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ba Y 26
SFX Ba 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ba i e/xPxE .
SFX Ba i a/xPxE .
SFX Ba i ego/xBxPxE .
SFX Ba i ų/xPxE .
SFX Ba i ej/xPxE .
SFX Ba i em/xPxE .
SFX Ba i emu/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Ba i ejų/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Ba 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Ba i ejši/zz .
SFX Ba i ejšego/zz .
SFX Ba i ejšemu/zz .
SFX Ba i ejšim/zz .
SFX Ba i ejšem/zz .
SFX Ba i ejše/zz .
SFX Ba i ejša/zz .
SFX Ba i ejšų/zz .
SFX Ba i ejšej/zz .
SFX Ba i ejšejų/zz .
SFX Ba i ejših/zz .
SFX Ba i ejšim/zz .
SFX Ba i ejšimi/zz .
SFX Ba i eje/zz .

SFX Bb Y 69
SFX Bb ti l .
SFX Bb ti la .
SFX Bb ti lo .
SFX Bb ti li .
SFX Bb ěti jų .
SFX Bb ěti im .
SFX Bb ěti iš .
SFX Bb ěti i .
SFX Bb ěti imȯ .
SFX Bb ěti ite .
SFX Bb ěti ęt .
SFX Bb ti h .
SFX Bb ti še .
SFX Bb ti hmȯ .
SFX Bb ti ste .
SFX Bb ti hų .
SFX Bb ěti ęći .
SFX Bb ěti ęća .
SFX Bb ěti ęće .
SFX Bb ěti imy .
SFX Bb ěti imogo .
SFX Bb ěti imomu .
SFX Bb ěti imym .
SFX Bb ěti imom .
SFX Bb ěti imo .
SFX Bb ěti ima .
SFX Bb ěti imų .
SFX Bb ěti imoj .
SFX Bb ěti imojų .
SFX Bb ěti imi .
SFX Bb ěti ime .
SFX Bb ěti imyh .
SFX Bb ěti imym .
SFX Bb ěti imymi .
SFX Bb ěti imo .
SFX Bb ti vši .
SFX Bb ti všego .
SFX Bb ti všemu .
SFX Bb ti všim .
SFX Bb ti všem .
SFX Bb ti vših .
SFX Bb ti všimi .
SFX Bb ti vša .
SFX Bb ti všų .
SFX Bb ti všej .
SFX Bb ti všejų .
SFX Bb ti vše .
SFX Bb ti ny .
SFX Bb ti nogo .
SFX Bb ti nomu .
SFX Bb ti nym .
SFX Bb ti nom .
SFX Bb ti ni .
SFX Bb ti ne .
SFX Bb ti nyh .
SFX Bb ti nymi .
SFX Bb ti na .
SFX Bb ti nų .
SFX Bb ti noj .
SFX Bb ti nojų .
SFX Bb ti no .
SFX Bb ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Bb ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Bb ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Bb ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Bb ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Bb ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Bb ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Bb ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Bc Y 11
SFX Bc 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bc 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Bc 0 y/xPxE .
SFX Bc 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Bc 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX Bc 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Bc 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Bc 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Bc 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Bc 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX Bc h še/xPxE .

SFX Bd Y 28
SFX Bd 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bd y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Bd y a/xPxE .
SFX Bd y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Bd y ų/xPxE .
SFX Bd y oj/xPxE .
SFX Bd y om/xPxE .
SFX Bd y omu/xPxE .
SFX Bd 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Bd y ojų/xPxE .
SFX Bd y i/xPxE .
SFX Bd y e/xPxE .
SFX Bd 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Bd 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Bd oky ši/zz .
SFX Bd oky šego/zz .
SFX Bd oky šemu/zz .
SFX Bd oky šim/zz .
SFX Bd oky šem/zz .
SFX Bd oky še/zz .
SFX Bd oky ša/zz .
SFX Bd oky šų/zz .
SFX Bd oky šej/zz .
SFX Bd oky šejų/zz .
SFX Bd oky ših/zz .
SFX Bd oky šim/zz .
SFX Bd oky šimi/zz .
SFX Bd soky še/xPxE .

SFX Be Y 32
SFX Be ti l .
SFX Be ti la .
SFX Be ti lo .
SFX Be ti li .
SFX Be ěti ajų .
SFX Be ěti ajem .
SFX Be ěti aješ .
SFX Be ěti aje .
SFX Be ěti ajemȯ .
SFX Be ěti ajete .
SFX Be ěti ajųt .
SFX Be ti h .
SFX Be ti še .
SFX Be ti hmȯ .
SFX Be ti ste .
SFX Be ti hų .
SFX Be ěti aj .
SFX Be ěti ajmȯ .
SFX Be ěti ajte .
SFX Be ěti ajųći .
SFX Be ěti ajųća .
SFX Be ěti ajųće .
SFX Be ěti ajemy .
SFX Be ěti ajema .
SFX Be ěti ajemo .
SFX Be ti vši .
SFX Be ti vša .
SFX Be ti vše .
SFX Be ti ny .
SFX Be ti na .
SFX Be ti no .
SFX Be ti ńje .

SFX Bf Y 32
SFX Bf ti l .
SFX Bf ti la .
SFX Bf ti lo .
SFX Bf ti li .
SFX Bf ti jų .
SFX Bf ti jem .
SFX Bf ti ješ .
SFX Bf ti je .
SFX Bf ti jemȯ .
SFX Bf ti jete .
SFX Bf ti jųt .
SFX Bf ti h .
SFX Bf ti še .
SFX Bf ti hmȯ .
SFX Bf ti ste .
SFX Bf ti hų .
SFX Bf ti j .
SFX Bf ti jmȯ .
SFX Bf ti jte .
SFX Bf ti jųći .
SFX Bf ti jųća .
SFX Bf ti jųće .
SFX Bf ti jemy .
SFX Bf ti jema .
SFX Bf ti jemo .
SFX Bf ti vši .
SFX Bf ti vša .
SFX Bf ti vše .
SFX Bf ti ny .
SFX Bf ti na .
SFX Bf ti no .
SFX Bf ti ńje .

SFX Bg Y 28
SFX Bg 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bg y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Bg y a/xPxE .
SFX Bg y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Bg y ų/xPxE .
SFX Bg y oj/xPxE .
SFX Bg y om/xPxE .
SFX Bg y omu/xPxE .
SFX Bg 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Bg y ojų/xPxE .
SFX Bg y i/xPxE .
SFX Bg y e/xPxE .
SFX Bg 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Bg 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Bg gy žějši/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějšego/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějšemu/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějšim/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějšem/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějše/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějša/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějšų/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějšej/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějšejų/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějših/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějšim/zz .
SFX Bg gy žějšimi/zz .
SFX Bg gy žeje/zz .

SFX Bh Y 11
SFX Bh 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bh 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Bh 0 i/xPxE .
SFX Bh 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Bh 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX Bh 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Bh 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Bh 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Bh 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Bh 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX Bh h še/xPxE .

SFX Bi Y 78
SFX Bi ti l .
SFX Bi ti la .
SFX Bi ti lo .
SFX Bi ti li .
SFX Bi ati ų .
SFX Bi ati em .
SFX Bi ati eš .
SFX Bi ati e .
SFX Bi ati emȯ .
SFX Bi ati ete .
SFX Bi ati ųt .
SFX Bi ti h .
SFX Bi ti še .
SFX Bi ti hmȯ .
SFX Bi ti ste .
SFX Bi ti hų .
SFX Bi ati i .
SFX Bi ati imȯ .
SFX Bi ati ite .
SFX Bi ati ųći .
SFX Bi ati ųćego .
SFX Bi ati ųćemu .
SFX Bi ati ųćim .
SFX Bi ati ųćem .
SFX Bi ati ųćih .
SFX Bi ati ųćimi .
SFX Bi ati ųća .
SFX Bi ati ųće .
SFX Bi ati emy .
SFX Bi ati emogo .
SFX Bi ati emomu .
SFX Bi ati emym .
SFX Bi ati emom .
SFX Bi ati emo .
SFX Bi ati ema .
SFX Bi ati emų .
SFX Bi ati emoj .
SFX Bi ati emojų .
SFX Bi ati emi .
SFX Bi ati eme .
SFX Bi ati emyh .
SFX Bi ati emym .
SFX Bi ati emymi .
SFX Bi ati emo .
SFX Bi ti vši .
SFX Bi ti všego .
SFX Bi ti všemu .
SFX Bi ti všim .
SFX Bi ti všem .
SFX Bi ti vših .
SFX Bi ti všimi .
SFX Bi ti vša .
SFX Bi ti všų .
SFX Bi ti všej .
SFX Bi ti všejų .
SFX Bi ti vše .
SFX Bi ti ny .
SFX Bi ti nogo .
SFX Bi ti nomu .
SFX Bi ti nym .
SFX Bi ti nom .
SFX Bi ti ni .
SFX Bi ti ne .
SFX Bi ti nyh .
SFX Bi ti nymi .
SFX Bi ti na .
SFX Bi ti nų .
SFX Bi ti noj .
SFX Bi ti nojų .
SFX Bi ti no .
SFX Bi ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Bi ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Bi ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Bi ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Bi ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Bi ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Bi ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Bi ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Bj Y 11
SFX Bj i e/xPxE .
SFX Bj i a/xPxE .
SFX Bj i ego/xBxPxE .
SFX Bj i ų/xPxE .
SFX Bj i ej/xPxE .
SFX Bj i em/xPxE .
SFX Bj i emu/xPxE .
SFX Bj 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Bj i ejų/xPxE .
SFX Bj 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Bj 0 mi/xPxE .

SFX Bk Y 28
SFX Bk 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bk y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Bk y a/xPxE .
SFX Bk y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Bk y ų/xPxE .
SFX Bk y oj/xPxE .
SFX Bk y om/xPxE .
SFX Bk y omu/xPxE .
SFX Bk 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Bk y ojų/xPxE .
SFX Bk y i/xPxE .
SFX Bk y e/xPxE .
SFX Bk 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Bk 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Bk ky ši/zz .
SFX Bk ky šego/zz .
SFX Bk ky šemu/zz .
SFX Bk ky šim/zz .
SFX Bk ky šem/zz .
SFX Bk ky še/zz .
SFX Bk ky ša/zz .
SFX Bk ky šų/zz .
SFX Bk ky šej/zz .
SFX Bk ky šejų/zz .
SFX Bk ky ših/zz .
SFX Bk ky šim/zz .
SFX Bk ky šimi/zz .
SFX Bk ky že/xPxE .

SFX Bl Y 4
SFX Bl a ě .
SFX Bl a oh .
SFX Bl a om .
SFX Bl a oma .

SFX Bm Y 78
SFX Bm ti l .
SFX Bm ti la .
SFX Bm ti lo .
SFX Bm ti li .
SFX Bm ti nų .
SFX Bm ti nem .
SFX Bm ti neš .
SFX Bm ti ne .
SFX Bm ti nemȯ .
SFX Bm ti nete .
SFX Bm ti nųt .
SFX Bm ti h .
SFX Bm ti še .
SFX Bm ti hmȯ .
SFX Bm ti ste .
SFX Bm ti hų .
SFX Bm ti ni .
SFX Bm ti nimȯ .
SFX Bm ti nite .
SFX Bm ti nųći .
SFX Bm ti nųćego .
SFX Bm ti nųćemu .
SFX Bm ti nųćim .
SFX Bm ti nųćem .
SFX Bm ti nųćih .
SFX Bm ti nųćimi .
SFX Bm ti nųća .
SFX Bm ti nųće .
SFX Bm ti nemy .
SFX Bm ti nemogo .
SFX Bm ti nemomu .
SFX Bm ti nemym .
SFX Bm ti nemom .
SFX Bm ti nemo .
SFX Bm ti nema .
SFX Bm ti nemų .
SFX Bm ti nemoj .
SFX Bm ti nemojų .
SFX Bm ti nemi .
SFX Bm ti neme .
SFX Bm ti nemyh .
SFX Bm ti nemym .
SFX Bm ti nemymi .
SFX Bm ti nemo .
SFX Bm ti vši .
SFX Bm ti všego .
SFX Bm ti všemu .
SFX Bm ti všim .
SFX Bm ti všem .
SFX Bm ti vših .
SFX Bm ti všimi .
SFX Bm ti vša .
SFX Bm ti všų .
SFX Bm ti všej .
SFX Bm ti všejų .
SFX Bm ti vše .
SFX Bm ti ny .
SFX Bm ti nogo .
SFX Bm ti nomu .
SFX Bm ti nym .
SFX Bm ti nom .
SFX Bm ti ni .
SFX Bm ti ne .
SFX Bm ti nyh .
SFX Bm ti nymi .
SFX Bm ti na .
SFX Bm ti nų .
SFX Bm ti noj .
SFX Bm ti nojų .
SFX Bm ti no .
SFX Bm ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Bm ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Bm ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Bm ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Bm ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Bm ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Bm ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Bm ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Bn Y 60
SFX Bn ti l .
SFX Bn ti la .
SFX Bn ti lo .
SFX Bn ti li .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmų .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmem .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmeš .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzme .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemȯ .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmete .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmųt .
SFX Bn ti h .
SFX Bn ti še .
SFX Bn ti hmȯ .
SFX Bn ti ste .
SFX Bn ti hų .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmi .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmimȯ .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmite .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmųći .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmųćego .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmųćemu .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmųćim .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmųćem .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmųćih .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmųćimi .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmųća .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmųće .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemy .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemogo .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemomu .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemym .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemom .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemo .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmema .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemų .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemoj .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemojų .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemi .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmeme .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemyh .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemym .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemymi .
SFX Bn zęti ȯzmemo .
SFX Bn ti vši .
SFX Bn ti všego .
SFX Bn ti všemu .
SFX Bn ti všim .
SFX Bn ti všem .
SFX Bn ti vših .
SFX Bn ti všimi .
SFX Bn ti vša .
SFX Bn ti všų .
SFX Bn ti všej .
SFX Bn ti všejų .
SFX Bn ti vše .
SFX Bn i y .
SFX Bn i a .
SFX Bn i o .
SFX Bn ti ťje .

SFX Bo Y 3
SFX Bo e ih .
SFX Bo e im .
SFX Bo e imi .

SFX Bp Y 13
SFX Bp i e .
SFX Bp i a .
SFX Bp i ego .
SFX Bp i ų .
SFX Bp i ej .
SFX Bp i em .
SFX Bp i emu .
SFX Bp 0 m .
SFX Bp i ejų .
SFX Bp 0 h .
SFX Bp 0 mi .
SFX Bp i ejši .
SFX Bp i eje .

SFX Bq Y 10
SFX Bq 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bq 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Bq 0 e/xPxE .
SFX Bq 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Bq 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX Bq 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Bq 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Bq 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Bq 0 em/xPxE .
SFX Bq 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX Br Y 11
SFX Br 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Br 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Br ȯt ti/xPxE .
SFX Br ȯt ta/xPxE .
SFX Br ȯt tov/xPxE .
SFX Br ȯt tu/xPxE .
SFX Br ȯt tah/xPxE .
SFX Br ȯt tam/xPxE .
SFX Br ȯt tom/xPxE .
SFX Br ȯt tami/xPxE .
SFX Br ȯt te/xPxE .

SFX Bs Y 6
SFX Bs 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bs 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Bs ȯk ka/xPxE .
SFX Bs ȯk ku/xPxE .
SFX Bs ȯk kom/xPxE .
SFX Bs ȯk če/xPxE .

SFX Bt Y 9
SFX Bt 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bt o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Bt o a/xPxE .
SFX Bt lo el/xPxE .
SFX Bt o u/xPxE .
SFX Bt o ah/xPxE .
SFX Bt o am/xPxE .
SFX Bt 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Bt o ami/xPxE .

SFX Bu Y 28
SFX Bu 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Bu y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Bu y a/xPxE .
SFX Bu y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Bu y ų/xPxE .
SFX Bu y oj/xPxE .
SFX Bu y om/xPxE .
SFX Bu y omu/xPxE .
SFX Bu 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Bu y ojų/xPxE .
SFX Bu y i/xPxE .
SFX Bu y e/xPxE .
SFX Bu 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Bu 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Bu ky ši/zz .
SFX Bu ky šego/zz .
SFX Bu ky šemu/zz .
SFX Bu ky šim/zz .
SFX Bu ky šem/zz .
SFX Bu ky še/zz .
SFX Bu ky ša/zz .
SFX Bu ky šų/zz .
SFX Bu ky šej/zz .
SFX Bu ky šejų/zz .
SFX Bu ky ših/zz .
SFX Bu ky šim/zz .
SFX Bu ky šimi/zz .
SFX Bu ky še/xPxE .

SFX Bv Y 69
SFX Bv ti l .
SFX Bv ti la .
SFX Bv ti lo .
SFX Bv ti li .
SFX Bv ziti žų .
SFX Bv ti m .
SFX Bv ti š .
SFX Bv ti 0 .
SFX Bv ti mȯ .
SFX Bv i e .
SFX Bv iti ęt .
SFX Bv ti h .
SFX Bv ti še .
SFX Bv ti hmȯ .
SFX Bv ti ste .
SFX Bv ti hų .
SFX Bv iti ęći .
SFX Bv iti ęća .
SFX Bv iti ęće .
SFX Bv ti my .
SFX Bv ti mogo .
SFX Bv ti momu .
SFX Bv ti mym .
SFX Bv ti mom .
SFX Bv ti mo .
SFX Bv ti ma .
SFX Bv ti mų .
SFX Bv ti moj .
SFX Bv ti mojų .
SFX Bv ti mi .
SFX Bv ti me .
SFX Bv ti myh .
SFX Bv ti mym .
SFX Bv ti mymi .
SFX Bv ti mo .
SFX Bv ti vši .
SFX Bv ti všego .
SFX Bv ti všemu .
SFX Bv ti všim .
SFX Bv ti všem .
SFX Bv ti vših .
SFX Bv ti všimi .
SFX Bv ti vša .
SFX Bv ti všų .
SFX Bv ti všej .
SFX Bv ti všejų .
SFX Bv ti vše .
SFX Bv ziti ženy .
SFX Bv ziti ženogo .
SFX Bv ziti ženomu .
SFX Bv ziti ženym .
SFX Bv ziti ženom .
SFX Bv ziti ženi .
SFX Bv ziti žene .
SFX Bv ziti ženyh .
SFX Bv ziti ženymi .
SFX Bv ziti žena .
SFX Bv ziti ženų .
SFX Bv ziti ženoj .
SFX Bv ziti ženojų .
SFX Bv ziti ženo .
SFX Bv ziti žeńje/xPxE .
SFX Bv ziti žeńja/xPxE .
SFX Bv ziti žeńju/xPxE .
SFX Bv ziti žeńjem/xPxE .
SFX Bv ziti ženij/xPxE .
SFX Bv ziti žeńjam/xPxE .
SFX Bv ziti žeńjami/xPxE .
SFX Bv ziti žeńjah/xPxE .
